Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1519
Obtaining support in violation of sections; violation; penalty.

Any person who by means of a willfully false statement or representation, or by impersonation or other device, obtains or attempts to obtain, or who aids or abets any other person in obtaining support under sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished pursuant to section 68-1017.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 19.